Montana, session 2025, HB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Directions to department of public health and human services. (1) For the purpose of
removing barriers to the timely treatment of serious mental illnesses, the department of public health and
human services may not require prior authorization under the medicaid program on any antipsychotic drug that
is approved by the U.S. food and drug administration, for its approved indications, for medicaid members 18
years of age and older.
(2) Nothing in this section may require the department to cover antipsychotic drugs not eligible for
coverage in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8.
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective [30 days after this act is passed and approved].
Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to claims submitted for payment for services provided on
or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 610
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 610, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 610
INTRODUCED BY K. SEEKINS-CROWE
AN ACT REVISING PREAUTHORIZATION LAWS; PROVIDING DIRECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES TO NOT REQUIRE AUTHORIZATION FOR CERTAIN
ANTIPSYCHOTIC DRUGS; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”